Washington statutes.
RCW 36.88.200

Improvement bonds—Form, contents, execution.

(1) Such bonds shall be numbered from one upwards consecutively, shall be in such denominations as may be provided by the county legislative authority in the resolution authorizing their issuance, shall mature on or before a date not to exceed twenty-two years from and after their date, shall bear interest at such rate or rates as authorized by the legislative authority payable annually or semiannually as may be provided by the legislative authority, shall be signed by the chair of the legislative authority and attested by the county auditor, shall have the seal of the county affixed thereto, and shall be payable at the office of the county treasurer or elsewhere as may be designated by the legislative authority. Such bonds may be in any form, including bearer bonds or registered bonds as provided in RCW 39.46.030. In lieu of any signatures required in this section, the bonds and any coupons may bear the printed or engraved facsimile signatures of said officials.

Such bonds shall refer to the improvement for which they are issued and to the resolution creating the road improvement district therefor.

(2) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, such bonds may be issued and sold in accordance with chapter 39.46 RCW.

[ 2009 c 549 s 4143; 1983 c 167 s 94; 1980 c 100 s 5; 1970 ex.s. c 56 s 55; 1969 ex.s. c 232 s 73; 1963 c 4 s 36.88.200. Prior: 1951 c 192 s 20.]

NOTES:

Liberal construction—Severability—1983 c 167: See RCW 39.46.010 and note following.

Purpose—1970 ex.s. c 56: See note following RCW 39.52.020.

Validation—Saving—Severability—1969 ex.s. c 232: See notes following RCW 39.52.020.